Mississippi, session 2026, SB2118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 19-25-63, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 19-25-63.  It shall be the duty of every sheriff to keep a record, to be called the "Jail docket," in which he or she shall note each warrant or mittimus by which any person shall be received into or placed in the jail of his or her county, entering the nature of the writ or warrant, by whom issued, the full name of the prisoner, when received, the date of the arrest and commitment, the arresting agency, for what crime or other cause the party is imprisoned, and on what authority, how long the prisoner was so imprisoned, how released or discharged, * * * and the amount of bond, the date of indictment, if any, issued by the grand jury, and the warrant therefor or the receipt of the officer of the penitentiary when sent there.  All of said entries shall be full and complete, so as to give a perfect history of each case.  The record shall be kept as a public record, and turned over to his or her successor. The sheriff shall submit his or her updated jail docket noting all currently-incarcerated persons to the board of supervisors via the Chancery Clerk sufficiently in advance of the board's first meeting of each month, and the same shall be examined carefully by the president of the board, and by any other members who desire to examine the same, to allow the report to be spread upon the board's minutes. SECTION 2.  Section 47-1-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 47-1-21.  The sheriff of each county shall keep a well bound alphabetical jail docket.  In it he or she shall promptly enter under the proper initial the full name, age, color and sex of each convict, the date of his or her commitment, each day worked on the county farm, time required to be served and amount of fine and costs and the jail fees charged against the prisoner and the date of discharge.  In the case of incarcerated persons awaiting trial, the sheriff shall promptly enter under the proper initial the full name, age, color and sex of each incarcerated person, the date of his or her commitment, the arresting agency, the offenses charged, the amount of bond, and the date of indictment, if any, issued by a grand jury. The sheriff shall submit his or her updated docket noting all currently incarcerated persons to the board of supervisors * * * at each of their regular meetings via the Chancery Clerk sufficiently in advance of the board's first meeting of each month, and the same shall be examined carefully by the president of the board, and by any other members who desire to examine the same, * * * in the presence of the board while in session to allow the report to be spread upon the board's minutes. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.